Washington statutes.
RCW 16.58.150

Situations when no inspection required—Fee—Suspension of license—Hearing.

No inspection shall be required when cattle are moved or transferred from one certified feed lot to another when they are accompanied by satisfactory proof of ownership and there is no change of ownership or from a certified feed lot to a point within this state, or out of state where this state maintains inspection, for the purpose of immediate slaughter. Any change of ownership within a certified feed lot requires a livestock inspection unless the cattle are sent direct to slaughter. An inspection fee as provided for in RCW 16.57.220 is payable to the director by the seller of the cattle or through the licensee as an agent. Upon notice by the director to suspend a license under this section, a person may request a hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2003 c 326 s 58; 1971 ex.s. c 181 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.